Utah statutes.
9-1-202.   Cooperation with other agencies and organizations.

In carrying out the provisions and purposes of this title, the department shall cooperate with, and make use of, the facilities and services of existing private or public agencies, corporations, persons, companies, or organizations to the fullest extent possible, and all state agencies, bureaus, or departments within their capabilities shall render full and complete cooperation to the department.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 241, 1992 General Session

